Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 4 Harbors and Harbor Lines

46-4-1.
Platting and establishment of harbor lines — Hearing.

The director of the department of environmental management may mark out harbor lines suitable to be established in any of the public tidewaters of the state, where the harbor lines have not already been established, and after the harbor lines shall have been platted may report that to the governor and senate for their approval; and when the harbor lines shall have been approved by the governor and senate or as the harbor lines shall be modified and approved thereby, the harbor lines shall be confirmed and established; but before any harbor line shall be marked out or platted by the director of the department of environmental management, the director shall appoint a time and place for hearing all persons interested therein, and shall give notice of the hearing by publishing the notice for at least thirty (30) days in the newspaper which the director may determine will probably give the most publicity of the notice among the persons most likely to be interested therein, and at the time and place appointed, or at such adjournment of the hearing as the director shall make, the director shall hear all persons interested for or against the establishment of the harbor line, who may appear to be heard therein before the department shall proceed to mark out the harbor line.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 118, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

46-4-1

.

46-4-2.
City and town control of harbors — Harbormasters — Extension of Providence jurisdiction.

The council of any city or town is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint a harbormaster for the harbors within the confines of the city or town, and to ordain and establish such bylaws and ordinances and establish such fees and compensation as the city council or town council may deem necessary and expedient for carrying out the provisions of this section; provided, that the jurisdiction, powers, and duties of the harbormaster of the city of Providence shall include all the public waters westerly of the easterly sides of the ship channels in Seekonk River, Providence River and Harbor and Narragansett Bay from the Pawtucket-Providence city line southerly to the point of intersection of the ship-channel side with a straight line drawn from Rumstick Point on the east shore to Rocky Point on the west shore, excluding that area subject to jurisdiction of the city of Cranston, pursuant to the provisions of §

46-4-5.1

, and all acts of the general assembly and ordinances of the city of Providence, now or hereafter passed, relative to the harbor of the city of Providence, shall apply to and be in force relative to the public waters.

The council of the town of Little Compton is hereby authorized and empowered to enact ordinances to regulate or ban the setting of lobster pots, fish nets, or cribs, within the harbor at Little Compton to prevent interference with the use of moorings or navigation therein; provided, further, that all harbormasters shall receive education and training in first aid and CPR from any entity which is authorized or licensed to conduct the training or education; provided, further, that all harbormasters shall attend The Rhode Island Harbormaster Training Academy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1121, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 144, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 149, § 27; P.L. 1928, ch. 1206, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 112, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

46-4-2

; P.L. 1959, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-3.
Town regulation of speed of vessels — Control of anchorages.

In addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of any town by authority of §

46-4-2

, authority shall also be granted to the town councils of the towns of Barrington, Little Compton, and Warren to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels on the public waters within the confines of those towns and to regulate the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the waters or harbors of the towns of Barrington, Little Compton, and Warren.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 139, § 1.

46-4-4.
Penalties for violation of town ordinances.

The town councils of the towns of Barrington, Little Compton, and Warren may impose penalties for the violation of ordinances and regulations, not exceeding in amount twenty dollars ($20.00) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the towns; provided, however, the penalties are not repugnant to the laws of this state or of the United States.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 139, § 2.

46-4-5.
East Providence harbor lines — Jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the city of East Providence shall include all of the public waters easterly of the easterly sides of the ship channels in the Seekonk River, Providence River and Harbor, and Narragansett Bay from the Pawtucket-East Providence city line southerly to the point of intersection of those ship channel sides with a straight line drawn from Gaspee Point on the west shore to Nayatt Point on the east shore; and all of the public waters on the northerly side of a line running sixty-five degrees (65 degrees) true from the intersection formed by the straight line drawn from Gaspee Point to Nayatt Point and the ship channel side to the point of intersection with the East Providence-Barrington boundary line; and all of the public waters, westerly and northerly, in Bullock Cove, of the East Providence-Barrington boundary line to the point of in intersection of the boundary line and the mean high water line.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 236, § 1.

46-4-5.1.
Cranston harbor lines — Jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the city of Cranston shall include all of the public waters westerly of the westerly sides of the ship channels in the Providence River and harbor from the Providence-Cranston city line southerly to the Cranston-Warwick city line.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 446, § 1.

46-4-6.
East Providence harbormaster — Authority.

In addition to any authority and powers conferred upon any city or town council under this title, the city council of East Providence is hereby authorized to appoint a harbormaster, and by ordinance grant such authority as the city council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any rules and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 236, § 2.

46-4-6.1.
Town of Barrington — Powers conferred.

The provision of §

46-22-14

or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Barrington authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Barrington to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 28, § 1.

46-4-6.2.
Town of Bristol — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Bristol, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Bristol to enact ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or desirable for the enforcement and supervision of any rules and regulations established by the town council governing the public waters and harbors within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect fees for the use of moorings; to provide for minimum mooring specifications; to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled; to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; and to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving; and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 292, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.3.
Town of South Kingstown — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of South Kingstown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of South Kingstown to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 73, § 1.

46-4-6.4.
Town of North Kingstown — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of North Kingstown authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of North Kingstown to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving, and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.5.
Town of Tiverton — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Tiverton, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Tiverton to authorize for the appointment of a harbor commission and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary or desirable to the harbor commission for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect fees for the use of moorings; to provide for minimum mooring specifications; to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled; to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin diving, and scuba diving; and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.6.
Town of Newport — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the city council of the city of Newport, authority shall also be granted to the city council of the city of Newport to authorize for the appointment of a harbor coordinator and by ordinance grant such authority as the city council may deem necessary to the harbor coordinator for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings, within the public waters within the confines of the city including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the city the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violators of the ordinances, not to exceed in amount three hundred dollars ($300) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the city.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 445, § 1.

46-4-6.7.
Town of Little Compton — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Little Compton, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Little Compton to enact ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or desirable for the enforcement of any rules and regulations established by the town council governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and objects and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect fees for the use of moorings, the fees to be recovered for use by the town of Little Compton; to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled; to regulate the location and placement of lobster pots, fish traps, and other fishing gear; to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; to provide for the removal of wrecks and derelicts or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving; to prevent littering and pollution of its public waters; and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.8.
Town of Narragansett — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Narragansett, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Narragansett to authorize the appointment of a harbormaster, assistant harbormasters, and a Harbor Management Committee and to enact such ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or desirable for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing of any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving, and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town. The town council shall also have the authority to recover the cost of removing any wreck or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks from the owner or persons responsible for the wrecks, derelicts, abandoned boats, or docks by suit in either the district court or the superior court of Washington County.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.9.
Town of Jamestown — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Jamestown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Jamestown to enact ordinances as the town council may deem necessary or desirable for the enforcement and supervision of any rules and regulations established by the town council governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorages within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to regulate waterskiing upon any of the public waters; to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained; to assign moorings; to remove moorings; to collect fees for the use of moorings; to provide for minimum mooring specifications; to provide for inspection of moorings; to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled; to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions; to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks; to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving; and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction for any one offense and the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.10.
Town of New Shoreham — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority or powers conferred upon the town council of the town of New Shoreham authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of New Shoreham to authorize it for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town, the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violators of the ordinances, not to exceed in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town. The town council shall also have the authority to recover the cost of removing any wreck or derelicts or abandoned boats or docks from the owner or persons responsible for the wrecks, derelicts, abandoned boats, or docks by suit in either the district court or the superior court of Washington County.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 375, § 1.

46-4-6.11.
Town of Charlestown — Powers conferred.

In addition to any authority or powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Charlestown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Charlestown to authorize it for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, and to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, and the size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any said public waters, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town, the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelicts or abandoned boats, and to impose penalties for violators of the ordinances, not to exceed in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town. The town council shall also have the authority to recover the cost of removing any wreck or derelicts or abandoned boats from the owner or persons responsible for the wrecks, derelicts, or abandoned boats by suit in either the district court or the superior court of Washington County.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 232, § 1.

46-4-6.12.
Town of Middletown — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Middletown, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Middletown to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the towns the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of said town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.13.
Town of Portsmouth — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Portsmouth authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Portsmouth to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title and, further, the provisions of this section shall not affect the location or assignment of any moorings existing on June 27, 1986, except that those deemed by the harbormaster to be located at an unacceptable site shall be moved should he or she so order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 462, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.14.
Town of East Greenwich — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of East Greenwich, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of East Greenwich to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skindiving and scubadiving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.15.
Town of Cranston — Powers conferred.

The provisions of §

46-22-14

, or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding, and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the city council of the city of Cranston, authority shall also be granted to the city council of the city of Cranston to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the said city council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the city including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the city the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of the city.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.

46-4-6.16.
Town of Warren — Powers conferred.

The provision of §

46-22-14

or any other provisions of the general laws notwithstanding and in addition to any authority and powers conferred upon the town council of the town of Warren, authority shall also be granted to the town council of the town of Warren to authorize for the appointment of a harbormaster and by ordinance grant such authority as the town council may deem necessary to the harbormaster for the enforcement and supervision of any ordinances, rules, and regulations governing the public waters within its jurisdiction, to regulate by ordinance the speed, management, and control of all vessels, both wind and power, and the number, size, type, location, and use of all anchorages and moorings within the public waters within the confines of the town including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the authority and power to prohibit waterskiing on any of the public waters, to provide for the regulation of skin diving and scuba diving, to designate upon a map of the public waters within the town the places where permanent or temporary moorings or anchorages may be maintained, to assign moorings, to remove moorings, to set and collect a fee for the use of moorings, to provide for minimum mooring specifications, to provide regulations for houseboats that are not self-propelled, to provide regulations for regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments, and exhibitions, to provide for the removal of wrecks or derelict or abandoned boats or docks, and to impose penalties for violation of the ordinances, not exceeding in amount one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment not exceeding ten (10) days in some jail or house of correction, for any one offense, the fines to be recovered to the use of said town.

No powers or duties granted herein shall be construed to abrogate the powers or duties granted to the coastal resources management council as provided in chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 38.